Hawaii statutes.
§712-1209.1 Solicitation of a minor for
prostitution. (1) A person eighteen years of age or older commits the
offense of solicitation of a minor for prostitution if the person
intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly offers or agrees to pay a fee to a minor
or to a member of a police department, a sheriff, or a law enforcement officer
who represents that person's self as a minor to engage in sexual conduct.

(2) Solicitation of a minor for prostitution
is a class C felony.

(3) A person convicted of committing the
offense of solicitation of a minor for prostitution shall be imposed a fine of
not less than $5,000; provided that $5,000 of the imposed fine shall be
credited to the general fund.

(4) This section shall not apply to any member
of a police department, a sheriff, or a law enforcement officer who offers or
agrees to pay a fee to a minor while acting in the course and scope of duties.

(5) The state of mind requirement for this
offense is not applicable to the fact that the person solicited was a minor. A
person is strictly liable with respect to the attendant circumstance that the
person solicited was a minor.

(6) For purposes of this section:

"Minor" means a person who is less
than eighteen years of age.

"Sexual conduct" has the same meaning
as in section 712‑1200(2). [L 2013, c 247, §1; am L 2014, c 114, §4]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1209.1

Act 247, Session Laws 2013, added this section, establishing
the offense of solicitation of a minor for prostitution as a class C felony for
offenders eighteen years of age or older. Act 247 also established a mandatory
fine for a person convicted of the offense of solicitation of a minor for
prostitution. The legislature found that Act 247 strengthened the laws and
penalties for crimes that exploit children subjected to prostitution.
Conference Committee Report No. 64.

Act 114, Session Laws 2014, amended this section by: (1)
clarifying that the offense of solicitation of a minor for prostitution applies
to intentional, knowing, or reckless conduct; (2) specifying that the offense
applies to solicitation of a person who represents that person's self as a
minor only if that person is a member of a police department, a sheriff, or a
law enforcement officer; (3) increasing the minimum fine imposed on a person
convicted of the offense; (4) providing an exemption for law enforcement acting
in the course and scope of duties; and (5) making the offense of solicitation
of a minor for prostitution a strict liability offense in regards to age. The
legislature unequivocally intended the solicitation of a minor for prostitution
to be a strict liability offense with regard to the age of the minor. Any
specified state of mind listed therein does not apply to the age of a victim
solicited under this section. Therefore, a defendant charged under this
section may not defend as to the defendant's state of mind concerning the age
of the victim, and will be strictly liable with respect to the age of the
victim and the attendant circumstance of the victim's age. Conference
Committee Report No. 41-14, Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3249.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next